Maryland, session 2025, SB0122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
10–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Gender identity” has the meaning stated in § 20–101 of the State Government
Article.
(c) “Homeless” means:
(1) lacking a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence; or
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0122*

SENATE BILL 122
(2) having a primary nighttime residence that is:
(i) a supervised publicly or privately operated shelter designed to
provide temporary living accommodations; or
(ii) a public or private place not designed for or ordinarily used as a
regular sleeping accommodation for human beings.
(d) “LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–201
OF THIS ARTICLE.
(E) “Sexual orientation” means the identification of an individual as to male or
female homosexuality, heterosexuality, or bisexuality.
10–304.
Motivated either in whole or in substantial part by another person’s or group’s race,
color, religious beliefs, sexual orientation, sex, gender identity, disability, or national origin,
or because another person or group is homeless OR A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER, a
person may not:
(1) (i) commit a crime or attempt or threaten to commit a crime against
that person or group;
(ii) deface, damage, or destroy, or attempt or threaten to deface,
damage, or destroy the real or personal property of that person or group;
(iii) burn or attempt or threaten to burn an object on the real or
personal property of that person or group; or
(iv) make or cause to be made a false statement, report, or complaint
that the person knows to be false as a whole or in material part, to a law enforcement officer
of the State, of a county, municipal corporation, or other political subdivision of the State,
or of the Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning Police, about that person or group,
with the intent to deceive and to cause an investigation or other action to be taken as a
result of the statement, report, or complaint, in violation of § 9–501 of this article; or
(2) commit a violation of item (1) of this section that:
(i) except as provided in item (ii) of this item, involves a separate
crime that is a felony; or
(ii) results in the death of a victim.
10–305.

SENATE BILL 122 3
A person may not deface, damage, or destroy, attempt or threaten to deface, damage,
or destroy, burn or attempt or threaten to burn an object on, or damage the real or personal
property connected to a building that is publicly or privately owned, leased, or used,
including a cemetery, library, meeting hall, recreation center, or school:
(1) because a person or group of a particular race, color, religious belief,
sexual orientation, sex, gender identity, disability, or national origin[, or because a person
or group that is homeless,] has contacts or is associated with the building; [or]
(2) BECAUSE A PERSON OR GROUP THAT IS HOMELESS HAS CONTACTS
OR IS ASSOCIATED WITH THE BUILDING;
(3) BECAUSE A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER OR GROUP OF LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS HAS CONTACTS OR IS ASSOCIATED WITH THE BUILDING;
OR
[(2)] (4) if there is evidence that exhibits animosity against a person or
group[, because of the race, color, religious beliefs, sexual orientation, sex, gender identity,
disability, or national origin of that person or group or because that person or group is
homeless]:
(I) BECAUSE OF THE RACE, COLOR, RELIGIOUS BELIEFS,
SEXUAL ORIENTATION, SEX, GENDER IDENTITY, DISABILITY, OR NATIONAL ORIGIN
OF THAT PERSON OR GROUP;
(II) BECAUSE THAT PERSON OR GROUP IS HOMELESS; OR
(III) BECAUSE THAT PERSON IS A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER
OR BECAUSE THAT GROUP CONSISTS OF LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.